Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB138.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2511(b) of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 2511. Grounds for involuntary termination.* * *(b) Other considerations.--(1) The court in terminating the rights of a parent shall give primary consideration to the developmental, physical and emotional needs and welfare of the child.(2) The rights of a parent shall not be terminated solely on the basis of:123456789101112131415161718 (i) environmental factors such as inadequate housing, furnishings, income, clothing and medical care if found to be beyond the control of the parent[.]; or(ii) unless parental rights are terminated under subsection (a)(9) or (10) (A)(9), (10) OR (11) , parental incarceration.(3) With respect to any petition filed pursuant to subsection (a)(1), (6) or (8), the court shall not consider any efforts by the parent to remedy the conditions described therein which are first initiated subsequent to the giving of notice of the filing of the petition.* * *Section 2. Section 6351(f)(9) of Title 42 is amended to read:§ 6351. Disposition of dependent child.* * *(f) Matters to be determined at permanency hearing.--At each permanency hearing, a court shall determine all of the following:* * *(9) If the child has been in placement for at least 15 of the last 22 months or the court has determined that aggravated circumstances exist and that reasonable efforts to prevent or eliminate the need to remove the child from the child's parent, guardian or custodian or to preserve and reunify the family need not be made or continue to be made, whether the county agency has filed or sought to join a petition to terminate parental rights and to identify, recruit, process and approve a qualified family to adopt the child unless any of the following provisions apply:20250HB0138PN3645 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) [the] The child is being cared for by a relative best suited to the physical, mental and moral welfare of the child[;].(ii) [the] The county agency has documented a compelling reason for determining that filing a petition to terminate parental rights would not serve the needs and welfare of the child[; or]. A compelling reason may include parental incarceration for a period exceeding 15 months, UNLESS THE INCARCERATION IS FOR AN OFFENSE SPECIFIED IN 23 PA.C.S. § 2511(A)(9) (RELATING TO GROUNDS FOR INVOLUNTARY TERMINATION) OR THE GROUNDS IN SECTION 2511(A)(10) OR (11) ARE SATISFIED, if: (A) the parent makes efforts to the extent feasible to comply with family service plan requirements and otherwise maintain a meaningful role in the child's life during the time of incarceration; and(B) termination of parental rights is not otherwise necessitated by the needs and welfare of the child.(iii) [the] The child's family has not been provided with necessary services to achieve the safe return to the child's parent, guardian or custodian within the time frames set forth in the permanency plan.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0138PN3645 - 3 - <--1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526